Wyoming, session 2026, HB0009.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 6-2-321 is created to read:
6-2-321. Grooming of minor for sexual offense;
definitions; penalties.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Electronic communication" means a sign,
signal, writing, image, sound, data or intelligence of any
nature transmitted or created, in whole or in part, by a
wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic or
photo-optical system or on a social media platform, gaming
platform or any other digital communication service;
(ii) "Grooming" means behavior, including
sending an electronic communication, that seeks to prepare,
induce or persuade a minor to engage in sexual conduct or
exploitation, even if no meeting or sexual conduct is
completed. "Grooming" includes:
(A) Deliberate acts that establish an
emotional connection with a minor through manipulation,
trust-building or influence to facilitate acts of sexual
conduct, sexual abuse or exploitation;
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0009
ENROLLED ACT NO. 12, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(B) Online or in-person activities, the use
of third parties or indirect methods to facilitate the
manipulation of a minor.
(iii) "Sexual conduct" means:
(A) Actual or simulated:
(I) Sexual intercourse, whether
between persons of the same or opposite sex;
(II) Penetration of the vagina or
rectum by any object, except when done as part of a
recognized medical procedure performed by a licensed
medical professional;
(III) Bestiality;
(IV) Masturbation;
(V) Sadomasochistic abuse;
(VI) Lewd exhibition of the genitals,
breasts, pubic or rectal area or other intimate parts of a
person; or
(VII) Defecation or urination for the
purpose of the sexual stimulation of the viewer.
(B) The depiction or observation of a child
in the nude or in a state of partial undress with the
purpose to:
(I) Abuse, humiliate, harass or
degrade the child;
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0009
ENROLLED ACT NO. 12, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(II) To arouse or gratify the person's
own sexual response or desire; or
(III) To arouse or gratify the sexual
response or desire of another person.
(iv) "Simulated" means any depiction of the
genitals or pubic or rectal area that gives the appearance
of sexual conduct or incipient sexual conduct.
(b) A person commits the offense of grooming of a
minor for a sexual offense if the person:
(i) Is eighteen (18) years of age or older and
not less than four (4) years older than the minor; and
(ii) Purposely or knowingly engages in a pattern
of grooming aimed at a minor with the intent to:
(A) Manipulate the minor into engaging in
sexual conduct;
(B) Coerce or entice a minor to meet in
person to engage in sexual conduct;
(C) Distribute or facilitate access to
sexually explicit material; or
(D) Exploit a position of authority to
develop an intimate or secretive relationship with a minor.
(c) Except as provided in subsections (d), (e) and
(g) of this section, grooming of a minor for a sexual
offense is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0009
ENROLLED ACT NO. 12, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
than five (5) years, a fine not to exceed ten thousand
dollars ($10,000.00), or both.
(d) A person who commits grooming of a minor for a
sexual offense against a minor who is younger than sixteen
(16) years of age but older than twelve (12) years of age
shall be guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for
not more than ten (10) years, a fine not to exceed ten
thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.
(e) A person who is not less than eighteen (18) years
of age who commits the offense of grooming of a minor for a
sexual offense against a minor who is less than twelve (12)
years of age shall be guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than fifteen (15) years, a fine
not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00), or
both.
(f) A person guilty of grooming of a minor for a
sexual offense under this section shall:
(i) Complete a sexual offender treatment program
provided or approved by the department of corrections;
(ii) Be subject to probation for a period not to
exceed ten (10) years.
(g) A person who occupies a position of authority in
relation to the victim and who commits the offense of
grooming of a minor for a sexual offense shall:
(i) Except as provided in paragraphs (ii) and
(iii) of this subsection, be guilty of a felony punishable
by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine
not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both;
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0009
ENROLLED ACT NO. 12, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ii) If the minor is between twelve (12) and
sixteen (16) years of age, be guilty of a felony punishable
by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) years, a fine
not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00), or
both;
(iii) If the minor is younger than twelve (12)
years of age, be guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) years, a fine
not to exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00), or
both.
Section 2. W.S. 6-2-301(a)(intro), 7-13-301(a)(intro)
and 7-19-302(g) are amended to read:
6-2-301. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article, unless otherwise
defined:
7-13-301. Placing person found guilty, but not
convicted, on probation.
(a) If a person who has not previously been convicted
of any felony is charged with or is found guilty of or
pleads guilty or no contest to any misdemeanor except any
second or subsequent violation of W.S. 31-5-233 or any
similar provision of law, or any second or subsequent
violation of W.S. 6-2-510(a) or 6-2-511(a) or any similar
provision of law, or any felony except murder, sexual
assault in the first or second degree, grooming of a minor
for a sexual offense, aggravated assault and battery or
arson in the first or second degree, the court may, with
the consent of the defendant and the state and without
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0009
ENROLLED ACT NO. 12, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
entering a judgment of guilt or conviction, defer further
proceedings and place the person on probation for a term
not to exceed thirty-six (36) months upon terms and
conditions set by the court. The terms of probation shall
include that he:
7-19-302. Registration of offenders; procedure;
verification; fees.
(g) For an offender convicted of a violation of W.S.
6-2-316(a)(i) and (iv), 6-2-321, 6-2-705, 6-4-303(b)(iv) or
6-4-304(b) if the victim was a minor, 18 U.S.C. §§ 2252B,
2252C, 2424 and 2425, an offense in another jurisdiction
containing the same or similar elements, or arising out of
the same or similar facts or circumstances as a criminal
offense specified in this subsection or an attempt or
conspiracy to commit any of the offenses specified in this
subsection, the division shall annually verify the accuracy
of the offender's registered address, and the offender
shall annually report, in person, his current address to
the sheriff in the county in which the offender resides,
during the period in which he is required to register.
During the annual in-person verification, the sheriff shall
photograph the offender. Confirmation of the in-person
verification required under this subsection, along with the
photograph of the offender, shall be transmitted by the
sheriff to the division within three (3) working days. Any
person under this subsection who has not established a
residence or is transient, and who is reporting to the
sheriff as required under subsection (e) of this section,
shall be deemed in compliance with the address verification
requirements of this section.
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0009
ENROLLED ACT NO. 12, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
7